Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9C-105] Examination authority. The
acts of the managing general
agent are considered to be the acts of the insurer on whose
behalf it is acting. A managing
general agent may be examined pursuant to article 2 as if the
managing general agent was the insurer. [L 2002, c 155, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next